California, session 20252026, SB1019.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Title 7 (commencing with Section 14000) is added to Part 4 of the Penal Code, to read:TITLE 7. California Cargo Theft Task Force14000. The Attorney General shall establish the California Cargo Theft Task Force to combat crimes involving the theft, diversion, embezzlement, unlawful taking, or fraudulent acquisition of cargo or freight. The task force shall focus on offenses involving cargo moving in, constituting, or affecting interstate or intrastate commerce.14001. The following definitions shall apply to this title:(a) “Cargo” means merchandise, goods, or wares that are transported or intended to be transported in commerce, including goods at any stage of the supply chain from origin to final destination, whether the goods are moving or temporarily stored.(b) “Cargo theft” includes the unlawful taking or appropriating of cargo or freight, including theft accomplished through fraud, deception, misrepresentation, or identity manipulation, from a commercial motor vehicle, trailer, railcar, intermodal container, warehouse, freight facility, distribution center, or other location within the supply chain, whether the cargo is moving in interstate or intrastate commerce.(c) “Task force” means the California Cargo Theft Task Force established by this title.14002. The membership of the task force shall include a task force commander, two law enforcement investigators, two police or security professionals employed within the rail or freight transportation industry, and any additional law enforcement personnel designated by the Attorney General.14003. The task force shall do all of the following:(a) Meet regularly to review investigations and intelligence and to provide updates on ongoing cases to task force members.(b) Investigate, apprehend, and recommend for prosecution, as appropriate, individuals or entities that engage in cargo theft or related offenses, including organized or repeat offenders and persons who knowingly facilitate, finance, or receive stolen cargo for financial gain.(c) Investigate offenses or violations that are under the jurisdiction of the Attorney General.(d) Review, investigate, and recommend for prosecution appropriate cases referred by federal, state, or local law enforcement agencies.(e) Coordinate with law enforcement agencies and industry stakeholders to identify emerging cargo theft trends and methods methods, to collect data on cargo theft in California, and to recommend prevention strategies.14004. (a) On or before January 1, 2028, and each year thereafter, the Attorney General shall submit a report to the Governor, Legislature, and Secretary of State on the activities of the task force. The report shall include all of the following, to the extent applicable:(1) A summary of investigations, prosecutions, and enforcement actions taken by the task force.(2) Information regarding trends and patterns related to cargo theft in this state. state, including data on cargo theft rates and the value of cargo stolen in California.(3) The amount and type of stolen cargo recovered.(4) Any recommendations for legislative or policy action relating to criminal penalties, enforcement tools, or interagency coordination to reduce cargo theft and protect the economy of this state.(b) A report submitted to the Legislature shall comply with Section 9795 of the Government Code.